Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-272
Water users' associations organized under reclamation act of the United States; stock subscriptions; how recorded; fees.

The county clerk is hereby authorized to accept from water users' associations, organized in conformity with the requirements of the United States under the reclamation act, books containing printed copies of their articles of incorporation and forms of subscription to stock, and to use such books for recording the stock subscriptions of such associations. The charges for the recording thereof shall be made on the basis of the number of words actually written therein.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 3, § 29, p. 857;

C.S.1922, § 8479;

C.S.1929, § 46-629;

R.S.1943, § 46-272.